Utah statutes.
70A-2a-206.   Offer and acceptance in formation of lease contract.
(1)  Unless otherwise unambiguously indicated by the language or
circumstances, an offer to make a lease contract must be construed as inviting
acceptance in any manner and by any medium reasonable in the circumstances.
(2)  If the beginning of a requested performance is a reasonable mode of
acceptance, an offeror who is not notified of acceptance within a reasonable
time may treat the offer as having lapsed before acceptance.
